Illinois, session 104th, HB3067.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Small 5Farmer Restoration Program Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Agricultural conservation easement" means a nonpossessory 8interest of a holder in real property imposing limitations on 9the use of the property to ensure the property remains 10available for agricultural purposes. 11    "Costs of acquisition" means out-of-pocket direct costs of 12activities incurred in connection with the processing, 13recording, and documentation of an agricultural conservation 14easement. "Costs of acquisition" includes out-of-pocket direct 15costs for appraisals, land surveys, title verification, and 16closing. "Costs of acquisition" does not include any costs 17incurred by a qualified easement holder for staffing, 18overhead, or operations. 19    "Director" means the Director of Agriculture. 20    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture. 21    "Eligible individual" means a resident of this State who: 22        (1) was born in this State;23        (2) is at least 21 years of age; and  HB3067 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1        (3) has previously been identified as a socially 2    disadvantaged farmer.3    "Federal poverty level" means the poverty guidelines 4updated periodically in the Federal Register by the U.S. 5Department of Health and Human Services under the authority of 642 U.S.C. 9902(2).7    "Fund" means the Small Farmer Restoration Program Fund.8    "Limited resource farmer" means a farmer with direct or 9indirect gross farm sales not more than the current indexed 10value in each of the previous 2 years, and who has a total 11household income that in each of the previous 2 years is less 12than or equal to the federal poverty level for a family of 4 or 13less than 50% of the county median household income.14    "New and beginning farmer" means a farmer who has operated 15a farm or ranch for less than 10 years.16    "Qualified easement holder" means a State agency, federal 17agency, county, municipality, or nonprofit organization under 18Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 with 19experience acquiring, whether through purchase, donation, or 20transfer, an agricultural conservation easement or other 21conservation easement.22    "Qualified entity" means an organization: 23        (1) that is a nonprofit corporation under Section 24    501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or an 25    organization that has a fiscal sponsor who is exempt from 26    taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue   HB3067 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1    Code of 1986; and 2        (2) that has a minimum of 3 years of experience 3    providing agricultural services, business assistance, 4    legal assistance, or advocacy services to socially 5    disadvantaged farmers.6    "Qualified farmland" means land that is in agricultural 7production or available for agricultural production, including 8row crops, livestock, nurseries, orchards, or pastures, and 9incidental land that is associated with an active agricultural 10operation.11    "Socially disadvantaged farmer" means a farmer who is a 12member of a socially disadvantaged group.13    "Socially disadvantaged group" means a group whose members 14have been subjected to racial, ethnic, or gender prejudice 15because of their identity as members of a group without regard 16to their individual qualities. These groups include all of the 17following:18        (1) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person having 19    origins in any of the original peoples of North and South 20    America, including Central America, and who maintains 21    tribal affiliation or community attachment).22        (2) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 23    original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or the 24    Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited to, 25    Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, Pakistan, 26    the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and Vietnam).  HB3067 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1        (3) Black or African American (a person having origins 2    in any of the black racial groups of Africa).3        (4) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, Mexican, 4    Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish 5    culture or origin, regardless of race).6        (5) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 7    person having origins in any of the original peoples of 8    Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands).9    "Technical assistance" includes, but is not limited to, 10organizing, advising, counseling, educating, planning, 11drafting, translating, interpreting, and consulting with 12socially disadvantaged farmers for the purpose of preparing 13them for favorable financing for land acquisition or 14negotiating leasing arrangements.15    "Training" means a program of training approved by the 16Director that: 17        (1) provides an eligible individual with the basic 18    skills to operate a farm profitably with a primary focus 19    on regenerating the soil, ecosystem, and local community;20        (2) provides a course of study that is equivalent to 21    no less than 30 academic credit hours of study, which may 22    be provided as direct in-field instruction;23        (3) focuses on low capital-intensive techniques and 24    technologies; and25        (4) studies local and regional food systems and the 26    market opportunities those systems present.   HB3067 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1    Section 10. Small Farmer Restoration Program Fund. 2    (a) The Small Farmer Restoration Program Fund is created 3as a special fund in the State treasury. Except as provided in 4subsection (b), the moneys in the Fund, upon appropriation by 5the General Assembly, shall be used for the purposes of the 6program, which include grants for the purchase of agricultural 7conservation easements, technical assistance grants, technical 8assistance provided by the Department, and administrative 9costs incurred by the Department in administering the program.10    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), moneys may be 11deposited into the Fund from federal grants and gifts and 12donations that are designated and required by the donor to be 13used exclusively for the purposes of the program.14    (c) Not more than 10% of available funds under this Act may 15be used for technical assistance purposes and administration. 16Not less than 90% of funds available for grants under this Act 17shall be expended for the acquisition of agricultural 18conservation easements. Moneys in the Fund shall also be 19available for the following purposes:20        (1) To provide technical assistance grants to 21    qualified entities in support of socially disadvantaged 22    farmers who are seeking access to farmland. 23        (2) To provide grants to qualified easement holders 24    for the purchase of agricultural conservation easements. 25    Moneys from the Fund shall be available in each fiscal   HB3067 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1    year to any qualified easement holder having made an 2    application that has been reviewed by the Department. 3    Award grants may include:4            (A) payment to qualified easement holders for the 5        purchase of agricultural conservation easements on 6        qualified farmland; or7            (B) payment of the costs of acquisition related to 8        the purchase of agricultural conservation easements 9        approved by the Department.10    (d) An agricultural conservation easement under this Act 11shall not prevent a property owner from constructing, 12improving, or maintaining a primary residence or housing for 13farmworkers on the land unless expressly specified in the 14easement deed. 15    Section 15. Department responsibilities. Subject to 16appropriation, the Department shall:17        (1) adopt a scoring process to be used in evaluating 18    applications for agricultural conservation easement grants 19    that prioritizes applications benefiting:20            (A) socially disadvantaged farmers;21            (B) limited resource farmers;22            (C) eligible individuals with a history of land 23        dispossession; and24            (D) new and beginning farmers;25        (2) include, as ranking criteria in the scoring   HB3067 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1    process, projects that:2            (A) leverage local, federal, or private funding, 3        including a match requirement;4            (B) support transition of farmland to next 5        generation owner-operators; and6            (C) support conservation priorities, including 7        protection of habitat, water quality, watershed 8        conservation, climate resilience, and local 9        conservation plans; and10        (3) include, as eligibility criteria, projects that:11            (A) protect farmland that is under threat of 12        conversion to other uses; and13            (B) demonstrate that the parcel proposed for 14        conservation is expected to continue to be used for 15        agricultural production if conserved. 16    Section 20. Farm Conservation Corps.17    (a) Subject to appropriation and in partnership with the 18University of Illinois Extension, the Department shall 19establish the Farm Conservation Corps to provide residents 20between the ages of 18 and 29 from socially disadvantaged 21groups the academic, vocational, and social skills necessary 22to pursue long-term and productive careers in agriculture.23    (b) The members of the Farm Conservation Corps shall serve 24as on-farm apprentices, at no cost, to farms that have been 25provided with an agricultural conservation easement under this   HB3067 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1Act or have an annual gross farm income of less than $250,000 2and that, in either case, are operated by: 3        (1) socially disadvantaged farmers; or4        (2) beginning farmers. 5    Section 25. Data collection and reporting.6    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Director shall make 7publicly available annual reports describing data on the 8recipients of the Department programs, including assistance 9from farm subsidy programs, and the amounts of the assistance, 10delineated by the race, ethnicity, and gender of the 11recipients.12    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall conduct 13research on the status of socially disadvantaged farmers, 14including, but not limited to:15        (1) the share of land ownership of those socially 16    disadvantaged farmers as compared to all farmers, 17    delineated by the race, ethnicity, and gender of the 18    landowners;19        (2) the share of the amount of assistance those 20    socially disadvantaged farmers receive from the Department 21    as compared to all farmers, delineated by the race, 22    ethnicity, and gender of the recipients;23        (3) the share, status, and receipt of loans by 24    socially disadvantaged farmers as compared to all farmers, 25    delineated by the race, ethnicity, and gender of the   HB3067 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1    recipients; and2        (4) an assessment of the reasons for disparities in 3    land ownership, assistance from the Department, and loans 4    for socially disadvantaged farmers compared to all 5    farmers.6    (c) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall conduct 7research on the demographics and status of farmworkers, 8including, but not limited to:9        (1) the races, ethnicities, ages, localities, wages, 10    benefits, and working conditions of farmworkers;11        (2) the economic contributions of farmworkers to the 12    State economy; and13        (3) the satisfaction of farmworkers with their 14    employment.15    (d) The Department shall:16        (1) investigate historical changes in reporting 17    methodology and misreporting of socially disadvantaged 18    farmers in the census of agriculture;19        (2) develop procedures to ensure that census of 20    agriculture surveys accurately capture the status of 21    socially disadvantaged farmers engaged in urban 22    agriculture; and23        (3) conduct, concurrently with each census of 24    agriculture, a review to assess:25            (A) the outreach efforts and methodologies used in 26        conducting the census of agriculture; and  HB3067 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1            (B) the effects of those outreach efforts and 2        methodologies on the counting of socially 3        disadvantaged farmers.4    (e) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall 5annually conduct and annually make publicly available reports 6describing in-depth research and analysis of corporate 7(domestic and foreign) land investment and ownership in this 8State with specific attention given to the impact of corporate 9land investment and ownership on:10        (1) land consolidation trends in this State and in the 11    United States;12        (2) challenges and opportunities for new and beginning 13    farmers accessing land for farming;14        (3) challenges and opportunities for members of 15    socially disadvantaged groups accessing land for farming; 16    and17        (4) crop selection and production trends. 18    Section 35. Rulemaking. By no later than December 31, 192026, the Department shall adopt rules to carry out the 20provisions of this Act, including the adoption of rules that 21establish a process for submitting and processing of 22applications for grants. Rules adopted under this Section 23shall align with existing federal and local programs to 24maximize potential for matching funds.   HB3067 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 05782 BDA 15812 b1    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 2Section 5.1030 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)4    Sec. 5.1030. The Small Farmer Restoration Program Fund. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.